Utah statutes.
7-7-43.   Previously incorporated associations.
(1)  The name, rights, powers, privileges, and immunities of every association
incorporated in this state before the effective date of this act shall be
governed, controlled, construed, extended, limited, and determined by the
provisions of this chapter to the same extent and effect as if the association
had been incorporated under this chapter.  The articles of incorporation,
certificate of incorporation, or charter, however entitled, bylaws and
constitution, or other rules of every such association made or existing before
the effective date of this act are hereby modified, altered, and amended to
conform to the provisions of this chapter, with or without the issuance or
approval by the commissioner of conformed copies of such documents, and are
declared void to the extent that they are inconsistent with the provisions of
this chapter; except, that the obligations of any such pre-existing
association, whether between the association and its members or stockholders,
or any of them, or any other person or persons, and any valid contracts
between the members or stockholders of any such association, or between the
association and any other person or persons, existing at the time this act
takes effect, may not in any way be impaired by the provisions of this
chapter.  With these exceptions, every association incorporated before the
effective date of this act shall possess the rights, powers, privileges, and
immunities and shall be subject to the duties, liabilities, disabilities, and
restrictions conferred and imposed by this chapter notwithstanding anything to
the contrary in its certificate of authority, certificate of incorporation,
bylaws, constitution, or rules.
(2)  All obligations to any association incorporated before the effective date
of this act contracted before the effective date of this act shall be
enforceable by it and in its name, and demands, claims, and rights of action
against the association may be enforced against it as fully and completely as
they could have been enforced in the absence of this chapter.
